Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-208
Research and extension center west of 102nd meridian; federal cooperation.

The Board of Regents is hereby authorized and empowered to take such steps in conjunction with the authorities of the United States as it deems necessary to successfully establish the research and extension center mentioned in section 85-206.

Laws 1909, c. 144, § 2, p. 503;

R.S.1913, § 7139;

C.S.1922, § 6789;

C.S.1929, § 85-205;

R.S.1943, § 85-208;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 78.